src-fst-morphology-phonology.twolc.md
**%{kgØ%}:g**
jõgi+N+Sg+Nom: **river / joki**
* *jõ{kØ}{kgØ}{back}^G2>i*
* *jõ0g00>i*
lugõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3
* *lu{kgØ}õ{back}^Pen^G2*
* *lugõ000*

**%{pbv%}:b**
* *tõ%{pØ%}%{pbv%}%{back%}%^G2i*
* *tõ0b00i*

hammas
* *ham%{bm%}a%{sØ%}%{back%}%^Pen%^WGStem*
* *hammas000*

**%{bm%}:m**
* *ham%{bm%}a%{sØ%}%{back%}%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem*
* *hammas00000*

**%{bm%}:b**
* *ham%{bm%}a%{sØ%}%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^G2%^WGStem*
* *hamba000000*

**%{bv%}:v**
* *när%{bv%}ä%{sØ%}%{back%}%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem*
* *närväs00000*
leib+N+Sg+Gen: **bread/leipä**
* *lei{bv}{front}^ÄI2ÄÄ^WGStem>{aä}*
* *leev000>ä*

**%{dn%}:n**
kannõĺ+N+Sg+Nom: **kantele**
* *kan%{dn%}õ%{lĺ%}%{back%}%^Pen%^WGStem%^PAL*
* *kannõĺ0000*

**%{dl%}:l**
* *tul%{back%}%>%{dl%}aq%^Pen%^WGStem*
* *tul0%>laq00*
* *kõnõl%{back%}%>%{dl%}aq%^Pen%^WGStem*
* *kõnõl0%>laq00*
* *val%{dl%}%{back%}%^G1%>n*
* *vall00%>n*

**%{dv%}:v**
* *pü%{üv%}%{dv%}%{front%}%^G1%>et*
* *püvv00%>et*
* *lu{uv}{dv}{back}^WGStem>{aä}*
* *luvv00>a*
* *sü%{üv%}%{dv%}%{front%}%^G1%>ä*
* *süvv00%>ä*

__VdVToVtV__

**dTos**

**tTos**

**tTod**
kaotama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: 
* *kaota%{back%}%^Pen%^WGStem*
* *kaoda000*

There should always be a trigger

** %{dn%}:d**

* *kan%{dn%}õl%{back%}%^Pen%^G2%^Pen%^VowRM%>õ*
* *kand0l00000%>õ*

**j2i**

**{kḱg}:g **

kõiḱ+Pron+Sg+Gen
* *kõi%{kØ%}%{kḱg%}%{back%}%^G2%^NoPAL%>%{eõ%}*
* *kõi0g00%>õ*

**k2g**
* *hõrak%{back%}%^G1%>a*
* *hõrag00%>a*
* ★*hõrak%{back%}%^G1%>a* (is not standard language)
* ★*hõrak00%>a* (is not standard language)
* *kisk%{back%}%^G1%>%{uü%}%>t%{aä%}v*
* *kis000%>u%>tav*

* *süküs%{front%}%^Pen%^WGStem%>e*
* *sügüs000%>e*

igä+N+Sg+Ill
* *i{kØ}{kgØ}ä{front}^Pen^G4*
* *ikkä00*
* *ko%{kg%}õr%{back%}%^StrGStem%^Pen%^VowRM%>õ*
* *kok0r0000%>õ*

**bTop**

**%{pbv%}:p**
* *tõ%{pØ%}%{pbv%}%{back%}%^G4%>%{eõ%}*
* *tõpp00%>e*

**%{pbØ%}:p**

**%{tdØ%}:t**

**%{kgØ%}:k**
* *mä%{kØ%}%{kgØ%}%{front%}%^G4%>%{eõ%}*
* *mäkk00%>e*

### STEM-FINAL CONSONANT LOSS
**s20**
kirotus+N+Pl+Gen:
* *kirotus%{back%}%^CnsRM%>isi*
* *kirotu000%>isi*

usś+N+Sg+Par **door**
* *uss%{back%}%^TS2S%>t*
* *us000%>t*

vaśma+V+Inf/mA
* *va{sØ}{sś}{back}^VOWRaise^WGStem^PAL>m{aä}*
* *va0ś0000>ma*

**%{bv%}:b**
närväs+A+Sg+Gen:
* *när%{bv%}ä%{sØ%}%{front%}%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^StrGStem%^WGStem*
* *närbä0000000*

**%{gØ%}:g**
liig+A+Sg+Nom:
* *lii%{gØ%}%{back%}%^StrGStem*
* *liig00*
huug

**d20**
* *hüdsi%{front%}%^TS2S%^VowRM%>te*
* *hü0s0000%>te*

**%{dØ%}:0**

**g20** deprication to {gǵØ}:0
* *aig%{back%}%^WGStem%>o*
* *a0000%>o*
argnõma+V+Inf
* *ar%{gØ%}{back}{eõ}^Pen^WGStem>d{aä}q*
* *ar00õ00>daq*

**%{gØ%}:0**
* *aig{back}^WGStem>o*
* *a0000>o*
igä+N+Sg+Gen
* *i{kØ}{kgØ}ä{front}^Pen^G1*
* *i00ä000*
lugõma+V+Pss+PrfPrc **read/lukea**
* *lu{kgØ}õ{back}^Pen^VOWLower^Pen^WGStem^VowRM>e>t*
* *lo00000000>e>t*
argnõma+V+Inf
* *ar{gØ}{back}{eõ}^Pen^WGStem>d{aä}q*
* *ar00õ00>daq*

* *palgõ%{back%}%^WGStem%>h*
* *pal0õ00%>h*

**{gǵØ}:0**
särǵ+N+Sg+Gen: **roach/särki**
* *sär{gǵØ}{front}^WGStem^NoPAL>%{eõ%}*
* *sär0000>e*

**{gǵØ}:g**
särǵ+N+Sg+Ill: **roach/särki**
* *sär{gǵØ}{front}^StrGStem^NoPAL>%{eõ%}*
* *särg000>e*

**%{pbv%}:v**
* *tõ%{pØ%}%{pbv%}%{back%}%^G1%>%{eõ%}*
* *tõ0v00%>õ*

**%{pbØ%}:0**

**%{tdØ%}:0**
* *hüdsi%{front%}%^TS2S%^VowRM%>te*
* *hü0s0000%>te*

**%{kgØ%}:0**
* *mä%{kØ%}%{kgØ%}%{front%}%^G1%>%{eõ%}*
* *mä0000%>e*

* *u%{jØ%}jo%{back%}%^Pen%^WGStem%>m%{aä%}*
* *u0jo000%>ma*

püüdmä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3
* *pü%{üv%}%{dd́v%}%{front%}%^PAL*
* *püüd́00*

pereq
* *pe%{rØ%}re%{front%}%^WGStem%>h*
* *pe0re00%>h*

naŕma
* *na%{rØ%}%{rŕ%}%{back%}%^CC2C%^PAL%>m%{aä%}*
* *na0r000%>ma*

### Other marks
* *ki%{pb%}õ%{nń%}%{back%}%>a*
* *kipõn0%>a*

**Disallow %^ErrorBack:0 in BHARM**

**Disallow %^ErrorBack:0 in BHARM**

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-vro/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc)</small>

---
